Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-457
Rules and regulations.

(1) To protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public and to insure to the greatest extent possible the efficient, adequate, and safe practice of health care in any health care facility or health care service licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act, the department shall adopt, promulgate, and enforce rules, regulations, and standards with respect to the different types of health care facilities and health care services, except nursing facilities and skilled nursing facilities, designed to further the accomplishment of the purposes of the act. Such rules, regulations, and standards shall be modified, amended, or rescinded from time to time in the public interest by the department.

(2) The department shall adopt, promulgate, and enforce rules, regulations, and standards with respect to nursing facilities and skilled nursing facilities. Such rules, regulations, and standards shall be in compliance with the Nebraska Nursing Home Act. Such rules, regulations, and standards shall be modified, amended, or rescinded from time to time in the public interest by the department.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 57;

Laws 2017, LB644, § 19.

Nebraska Nursing Home Act, see section 71-6037.